Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
488

LEGAL
SERVICE PLANS

Section

488-1 Definitions

488-2 Applicability; other statutes, rules of
court

488-3 Certificate of authority; authority issued
or denied;

plan termination

488-4 Accumulated funds, protection, violation

488-5 Annual exhibits; examination by director

488-6 Investments of certain plans

488-7 Failure to comply; penalty

488-8 Access to records

488-9 Records and reports

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 2011, c 186, §2.

Law Journals and Reviews

Prepaid Legal Service: Its Development and Future. 11 HBJ
87.

Prepaid Legal Service: Its Development and Future, Part II.
12 HBJ 3.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next